Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2384.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(4) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended by adding a subparagraph and the section is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act.* * *(4) "Unfair methods of competition" and "unfair or deceptive acts or practices" mean any one or more of the following:* * *(xx.1) Promoting or engaging in dynamic pricing.* * *12345678910111213141516171819 (14) "Dynamic pricing" means as follows:(i) The practice of varying the prices of essential goods or services within a twenty-four-hour period based on demand or other factors, including through the use of artificial intelligence or an artificial intelligence model that retrains or recalibrates based on received information.(ii) The term does not include bona fide pricing.(iii) For purposes of this paragraph:(A) "Artificial intelligence" means all of the following:(I) A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to:(a) perceive real and virtual environments;(b) abstract perceptions made under this paragraph into models through analysis in an automated manner; and(c) use model inference to formulate options for information or action based on outcomes under units (a) and (b).(II) The term includes generative artificial intelligence. (B) "Artificial intelligence model" means a component of an information system that implements artificial intelligence technology and uses computational, statistical or machine learning techniques to produce outputs from a given set of inputs.(C) "Bona fide pricing" means genuine, nonfictitious pricing at which essential goods or services are openly and actively offered to the public on a regular basis for a reasonably substantial period of time, without using inflated former prices to create deceptive or illusory discounts, in accordance with 16 CFR 233.1 (relating to former price comparisons).20260HB2384PN3198 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) "Essential goods or services" means tangible personal property or services that are excluded under section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the "Tax Reform Code of 1971," from the tax imposed under section 202 of the "Tax Reform Code of 1971."(E) "Generative artificial intelligence" means the class of models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content, including information such as images, videos, audio clips or text, that has been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by artificial intelligence.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2384PN3198 - 3 - 123456789101112